Utah statutes.
20A-16-502.   Publication of election notice.

(1)  At least 100 days before an election, other than a statewide special election or local special election, and as soon as practicable before a statewide special election or local special election, the election officer shall prepare an election notice for the election officer's jurisdiction, to be used in conjunction with a federal write-in absentee ballot.

(2)  The election notice must contain:

(a)  a list of all of the ballot propositions and federal, state, and local offices that as of that date the election officer expects to be on the ballot on the date of the election; and

(b)  specific instructions for how a covered voter is to indicate on the federal write-in absentee ballot the covered voter's choice for each office to be filled and for each ballot proposition to be contested.

(3) (a)  A covered voter may request a copy of an election notice.

(b)  The election officer shall send the notice to the covered voter by facsimile, email, or regular mail, as the covered voter requests.

(4)  As soon as the ballot is certified, and not later than the date ballots are required to be transmitted to voters under Chapter 3, Part 3, Absentee Voting, the election officer charged with preparing the election notice under Subsection (1) shall update the notice with the certified candidates for each office and ballot propositions and make the updated notice publicly available.

(5)  A political subdivision that maintains a website shall make the election notice prepared under this section and updated versions of the election notice regularly available on the website.



Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

